Utah statutes.
26-21a-301.   Breast cancer mortality reduction program.

The department shall create a breast cancer mortality reduction program.  The program shall include:

(1)  education programs for health professionals regarding skills in cancer screening, diagnosis, referral, treatment, and rehabilitation based on current scientific knowledge;

(2)  education programs to assist the public in understanding:

(a)  the benefits of regular breast cancer screening;

(b)  resources available in the medical care system for cancer screening, diagnosis, referral, treatment, and rehabilitation; and

(c)  available options for treatment of breast cancer and the ramifications of each approach; and

(3)  subsidized screening mammography for low-income women as determined by the department standards.

